Hawaii statutes.
§235-55.85 Refundable food/excise tax
credit. (a) [Repeal and reenactment on December 31, 2017. L 2015, c
223, §4.] Each individual taxpayer, who files an individual income
tax return for a taxable year, and who is not claimed or is not otherwise eligible
to be claimed as a dependent by another taxpayer for federal or Hawaii state
individual income tax purposes, may claim a refundable food/excise tax credit
against the taxpayer's individual income tax liability for the taxable year for
which the individual income tax return is being filed; provided that an
individual who has no income or no income taxable under this chapter and who is
not claimed or is not otherwise eligible to be claimed as a dependent by a
taxpayer for federal or Hawaii state individual income tax purposes may claim
this credit.

(b) [Repeal and reenactment on December 31,
2017. L 2015, c 223, §4.] Each individual taxpayer may claim a
refundable food/excise tax credit multiplied by the number of qualified
exemptions to which the taxpayer is entitled in accordance with the table
below; provided that a husband and wife filing separate tax returns for a
taxable year for which a joint return could have been filed by them shall claim
only the tax credit to which they would have been entitled had a joint return
been filed.

Adjusted gross income Credit per
exemption

for taxpayers filing

a single return

Under $5,000 $110

$5,000 under $10,000 $100

$10,000 under $15,000 $ 85

$15,000 under $20,000 $ 70

$20,000 under $30,000 $ 55

$30,000 and over $ 0

Adjusted gross
income Credit per exemption

for heads of
household,

married individuals filing

separate returns, and

married couples filing

joint returns

Under $5,000 $110

$5,000 under $10,000 $100

$10,000 under $15,000 $ 85

$15,000 under $20,000 $ 70

$20,000 under $30,000 $ 55

$30,000 under $40,000 $ 45

$40,000 under $50,000 $ 35

$50,000 and over $ 0

(c) [Repeal and reenactment on December 31,
2017. L 2015, c 223, §4.] For the purposes of this section, a
qualified exemption is defined to include those exemptions permitted under this
chapter; provided that no additional exemption may be claimed by a taxpayer who
is sixty-five years of age or older; provided that a person for whom exemption
is claimed has been physically present in the State for more than nine months
during the taxable year; and provided further that multiple exemptions shall
not be granted because of deficiencies in vision or hearing, or other
disability. For purposes of claiming this credit only, a minor child receiving
support from the department of human services of the State, social security
survivor's benefits, and the like, may be considered a dependent and a
qualified exemption of the parent or guardian.

(d) The tax credit under this section shall not
be available to:

(1) Any person who has been convicted of a felony and
who has been committed to prison and has been physically confined for the full
taxable year;

(2) Any person who would otherwise be eligible to be
claimed as a dependent but who has been committed to a youth correctional
facility and has resided at the facility for the full taxable year; or

(3) Any misdemeanant who has been committed to jail
and has been physically confined for the full taxable year.

(e) [Repeal and reenactment on December 31,
2017. L 2015, c 223, §4.] The tax credits claimed by a taxpayer
pursuant to this section shall be deductible from the taxpayer's individual
income tax liability, if any, for the tax year in which they are properly
claimed. If the tax credits claimed by a taxpayer exceed the amount of income
tax payment due from the taxpayer, the excess of credits over payments due
shall be refunded to the taxpayer; provided that tax credits properly claimed
by an individual who has no income tax liability shall be paid to the
individual; and provided further that no refunds or payment on account of the
tax credits allowed by this section shall be made for amounts less than $1.

(f) All claims for tax credits under this
section, including any amended claims, shall be filed on or before the end of
the twelfth month following the close of the taxable year for which the credits
may be claimed. Failure to comply with the foregoing provision shall
constitute a waiver of the right to claim the credit.

(g) For the purposes of this section,
"adjusted gross income" means adjusted gross income as defined by the
Internal Revenue Code. [L 1998, c 157, §1; am L 2007, c 211, §1; am L 2015, c
223, §2]

Note

The 2015 amendment applies to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2015. L 2015, c 223, §4.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next